New York, session 2025-2026, A8311.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 76 to read as follows: 3 76. In the county of Putnam, the provisions of this section requiring 4 a person to be a resident of the political subdivision or municipal 5 corporation of the state for which such person shall be chosen or within 6 which their official functions are required to be exercised, shall not 7 prevent a person regularly admitted to practice as an attorney or coun- 8 selor in the courts of record of this state from holding the office of 9 Putnam county attorney, provided that such person resides in a county 10 adjoining Putnam county within the state of New York; provided, however 11 that any person performing such functions or holding such offices in any 12 other county shall be a resident of such county unless otherwise 13 provided by law. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11908-01-5